Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.01, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purposes of sections 148.01 to 148.10: new text begin (1) "abnormal articulation" means the condition of opposing bony joint surfaces and their related soft tissues that do not function normally, including subluxation, fixation, adhesion, degeneration, deformity, dislocation, or other pathology that results in pain or disturbances within the nervous system, results in postural alteration, inhibits motion, allows excessive motion, alters direction of motion, or results in loss of axial loading efficiency, or a combination of these; new text end new text begin (2) "acupuncture" means a modality of treating abnormal physical conditions by stimulating various points of the body or interruption of the cutaneous integrity by needle insertion to secure a reflex relief of the symptoms by nerve stimulation as utilized as an adjunct to chiropractic adjustment; new text end new text begin (3) "animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment" means treatment that includes identification and resolution of vertebral subluxation complexes, spinal manipulation, and manipulation of the extremity articulations of nonhuman vertebrates. Animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment does not include: new text end new text begin (i) performing surgery; new text end new text begin (ii) dispensing or administering medications; or new text end new text begin (iii) performing traditional veterinary care and diagnosis; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (4) new text end "chiropractic" means the health care discipline that recognizes the innate recuperative power of the body to heal itself without the use of drugs or surgery by identifying and caring for vertebral subluxations and other abnormal articulations by emphasizing the relationship between structure and function as coordinated by the nervous system and how that relationship affects the preservation and restoration of health; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end "chiropractic services" means the evaluation and facilitation of structural, biomechanical, and neurological function and integrity through the use of adjustment, manipulation, mobilization, or other procedures accomplished by manual or mechanical forces applied to bones or joints and their related soft tissues for correction of vertebral subluxation, other abnormal articulations, neurological disturbances, structural alterations, or biomechanical alterations, and includesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but is not limited todeleted text begin ,deleted text end manual therapy and mechanical therapy as defined in section 146.23; deleted text begin (3) "abnormal articulation" means the condition of opposing bony joint surfaces and their related soft tissues that do not function normally, including subluxation, fixation, adhesion, degeneration, deformity, dislocation, or other pathology that results in pain or disturbances within the nervous system, results in postural alteration, inhibits motion, allows excessive motion, alters direction of motion, or results in loss of axial loading efficiency, or a combination of these; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end "diagnosis" means the physical, clinical, and laboratory examination of the patient, and the use of diagnostic services for diagnostic purposes within the scope of the practice of chiropractic described in sections 148.01 to 148.10; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end "diagnostic services" means clinical, physical, laboratory, and other diagnostic measures, including diagnostic imaging that may be necessary to determine the presence or absence of a condition, deficiency, deformity, abnormality, or disease as a basis for evaluation of a health concern, diagnosis, differential diagnosis, treatment, further examination, or referral; new text begin (8) "good standing" means that a license is not the subject of current disciplinary action under section 148.10 or an equivalent disciplinary law in another jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (9) "reinstatement" means the process by which a board-terminated license or voluntarily retired license returns to active license status under section 148.071 or 148.076; new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end "therapeutic services" means rehabilitative therapy as defined in Minnesota Rules, part 2500.0100, subpart 11, and all of the therapeutic, rehabilitative, and preventive sciences and procedures for which the licensee was subject to examination under section 148.06deleted text begin . When provided, therapeutic services must be performed within a practice where the primary focus is the provision of chiropractic services, to prepare the patient for chiropractic services, or to complement the provision of chiropractic services. The administration of therapeutic services is the responsibility of the treating chiropractor and must be rendered under the direct supervision of qualified staffdeleted text end ;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (7) "acupuncture" means a modality of treating abnormal physical conditions by stimulating various points of the body or interruption of the cutaneous integrity by needle insertion to secure a reflex relief of the symptoms by nerve stimulation as utilized as an adjunct to chiropractic adjustment. Acupuncture may not be used as an independent therapy or separately from chiropractic services. Acupuncture is permitted under section 148.01 only after registration with the board which requires completion of a board-approved course of study and successful completion of a board-approved national examination on acupuncture. Renewal of registration shall require completion of board-approved continuing education requirements in acupuncture. The restrictions of section 147B.02, subdivision 2, apply to individuals registered to perform acupuncture under this section; and deleted text end deleted text begin (8) "animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment" means treatment that includes identifying and resolving vertebral subluxation complexes, spinal manipulation, and manipulation of the extremity articulations of nonhuman vertebrates. Animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment does not include: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) performing surgery; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) dispensing or administering of medications; or deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) performing traditional veterinary care and diagnosis. deleted text end new text begin (11) "voluntarily retired license" means a license held by a chiropractor who has changed the chiropractor's license status to a voluntarily retired license under section 148.075. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.01, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Practice of chiropractic. An individual licensed to practice under section 148.06 is authorized to perform chiropractic servicesdeleted text begin , acupuncture,deleted text end and therapeutic services, and to provide diagnosis and to render opinions pertaining to those services for the purpose of determining a course of action in the best interests of the patient, such as a treatment plan, appropriate referral, or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Practice of therapeutic services. new text end new text begin Therapeutic services must be performed within a practice where the primary focus is the provision of chiropractic services, preparing the patient for chiropractic services, or complementing the provision of chiropractic services. The administration of therapeutic services is the responsibility of the treating chiropractor and must be rendered under the direct supervision of qualified staff. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Practice of acupuncture. new text end new text begin Acupuncture must not be used as an independent therapy or separately from chiropractic services. Acupuncture is permitted under this section only after registration with the board, which requires completing a board-approved course of study and a board-approved national examination on acupuncture. Renewal of registration requires completing board-approved continuing education requirements in acupuncture. The restrictions of section 147B.02, subdivision 2, apply to individuals registered to perform acupuncture under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [148.071] REINSTATEMENT OF A LICENSE TERMINATED FOR FAILING TO RENEW OR TO COMPLETE CONTINUING EDUCATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin This section applies to a chiropractor whose Minnesota license was terminated by the board for failing to timely renew the license or complete annual continuing education requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application requirements. new text end new text begin At the time of application for reinstatement, the applicant must: new text end new text begin (1) submit an application for reinstatement and pay the application fee; new text end new text begin (2) pay the current renewal fee; new text end new text begin (3) complete a criminal background check as prescribed under section 214.075 and pay the required fee; new text end new text begin (4) submit license verification from each jurisdiction where the applicant holds or has held a chiropractic license; new text end new text begin (5) submit evidence of passing the board's jurisprudence exam; new text end new text begin (6) submit evidence of correcting any outstanding requirements and paying any outstanding fees that existed at the time the license was terminated; and new text end new text begin (7) complete any additional applicable requirements established in subdivisions 3, 4, 5, 6, and 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of terminated license for licensee in good standing in another jurisdiction. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant who is currently licensed and in good standing in another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of the active chiropractic license in good standing in another jurisdiction; and new text end new text begin (3) provides verification of completing 20 continuing education hours in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of terminated license after five years or less. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 and who applies for reinstatement five years or less after license termination in Minnesota or another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of: new text end new text begin (i) completing 20 continuing education hours for each year since the applicant last held an active license in good standing in Minnesota or another jurisdiction and 20 continuing education hours in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement; or new text end new text begin (ii) passing the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractic, or an alternate examination the board determines is equivalent, within 12 months after application. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of terminated license after more than five years. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 and who applies for reinstatement more than five years after license termination in Minnesota or another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of completing 20 continuing education hours for each year since the applicant last held an active license in good standing in Minnesota or another jurisdiction and 20 continuing education hours in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement, not to exceed a maximum of 100 required continuing education hours; and new text end new text begin (3) provides verification of passing the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractic, or an alternate examination the board determines is equivalent, within 12 months after application. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reinstatement within the same calendar year of continuing education termination. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant whose license was terminated for failing to submit the required number of continuing education hours if within the same calendar year of termination the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes the required number of continuing education hours and outstanding penalty hours imposed by the board; and new text end new text begin (2) pays all application fees and penalty fees. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Board authority. new text end new text begin Applications for reinstatement and licenses reinstated under this section are subject to the same board authority under sections 148.10 and 214.103 as other applications and licenses issued by the board to deny, refuse to issue, revoke, suspend, condition, or limit a license or to take disciplinary or corrective action against a licensee or applicant for conduct that violates applicable law or professional standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Continuing education in year of reinstatement. new text end new text begin A licensee must not use continuing education hours obtained for the purpose of applying for reinstatement of a terminated license under this section to meet the annual hour requirement for the year in which the license is reinstated. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Previously terminated licenses. new text end new text begin If a chiropractor's license was terminated before July 1, 2026, and the chiropractor applies for reinstatement under this section, the chiropractor is not required to repay any renewal fees that accrued before the license reinstatement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [148.075] VOLUNTARILY RETIRED LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin A Minnesota licensed chiropractor in good standing and with no continuing education audit deficiencies may apply to the board to voluntarily retire a license by submitting an application on a form provided by the board and a signed affidavit stating that the applicant will no longer actively practice chiropractic in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grounds for denial. new text end new text begin The board may deny an application to voluntarily retire a license if the applicant's Minnesota license or license issued in another jurisdiction is not in good standing or is subject to a pending disciplinary action. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [148.076] REINSTATEMENT OF A VOLUNTARILY RETIRED LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin This section applies to a chiropractor who voluntarily retired a Minnesota chiropractic license under section 148.075. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application requirements. new text end new text begin At the time of application for reinstatement, the applicant must: new text end new text begin (1) submit an application for reinstatement; new text end new text begin (2) pay the current renewal fee; new text end new text begin (3) complete a criminal background check as prescribed under section 214.075 and pay the required fee; new text end new text begin (4) submit license verification from each jurisdiction where the applicant holds or has held a chiropractic license; new text end new text begin (5) submit evidence of passing the board's jurisprudence exam; new text end new text begin (6) submit evidence of correcting any outstanding requirements and paying any outstanding fees that existed at the time the license was voluntarily retired; and new text end new text begin (7) complete any additional applicable requirements in subdivisions 3, 4, 5, and 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of voluntarily retired license for licensee in good standing in another jurisdiction. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant who is currently licensed and in good standing in another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of the active chiropractic license in good standing in another jurisdiction; and new text end new text begin (3) provides verification of completing 20 continuing education hours in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of voluntarily retired license after five years or less. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 and who applies for reinstatement five years or less after voluntary license retirement in Minnesota or the equivalent in another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of: new text end new text begin (i) completing 20 continuing education hours for each year since the applicant last held an active license in good standing in Minnesota or another jurisdiction and 20 continuing education hours in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement; or new text end new text begin (ii) passing the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractic, or an alternate examination the board determines is equivalent, within 12 months after application. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of voluntarily retired license after more than five years. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the license of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 and who applies for reinstatement more than five years after voluntary license retirement in Minnesota or the equivalent in another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of completing 20 continuing education hours for each year since the applicant last held an active license in good standing in Minnesota or another jurisdiction and 20 continuing education hours in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement, not to exceed a maximum of 100 required continuing education hours; and new text end new text begin (3) provides verification of passing the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractic, or an alternate examination the board determines is equivalent, within 12 months after application. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Board authority. new text end new text begin Applications for reinstatement and licenses reinstated under this section are subject to the same board authority under sections 148.10 and 214.103 as other applications and licenses issued by the board to deny, refuse to issue, revoke, suspend, condition, or limit a license or to take disciplinary or corrective action against a licensee or applicant for conduct that violates applicable law or professional standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Continuing education in year of reinstatement. new text end new text begin A licensee must not use continuing education hours obtained for the purpose of applying for reinstatement of a voluntarily retired license under this section to meet the annual hour requirement for the year the license is reinstated. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Previously voluntarily retired licensees. new text end new text begin (a) If a chiropractor who voluntarily retired before July 1, 2026, applies for reinstatement under this section, the chiropractor is not required to repay any renewal fees that accrued before the license reinstatement. new text end new text begin (b) Before reinstatement under this subdivision, the voluntarily retired licensee must complete any outstanding continuing education hours due at the time the license was voluntarily retired. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.09, is amended to read: 148.09 INDEPENDENT EXAMINATION. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Requirements for examiners. new text end new text begin (a) new text end A doctor of chiropractic conducting a physical examination of a patient or a review of records by a doctor of chiropractic, for the purpose of generating a report or opinion to aid a reparation obligor under chapter 65B in making a determination regarding the condition or further treatment of the patient, shall meet the following requirements: (1) the doctor of chiropractic must either be an instructor at an accredited school of chiropractic or have devoted not less than 50 percent of practice time to direct patient care during the two years immediately preceding the examination; (2) the doctor of chiropractic must have completed any annual continuing education requirements for chiropractors prescribed by the Board of Chiropractic Examiners; (3) the doctor of chiropractic must not accept a fee of more than $500 for each independent exam conducted; and (4) the doctor of chiropractic must register with the Board of Chiropractic Examiners as an independent examiner and adhere to all rules governing the practice of chiropractic. new text begin (b) The examiner must identify in the written report the source of all records reviewed and the dates or period of services covered by those records. The examiner's notes and a copy of the final written report must be retained for at least four years following the examination. new text end new text begin (c) Before conducting an independent examination, the examiner must provide written disclosures to the examinee that clearly state the purpose of the examination and the examinee's right to have a third party present under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Third-party presence during examinations. new text end new text begin (a) An examiner performing an independent examination under this section must not prohibit the examinee from having a third party of the examinee's choice present during the consultation and examination. The examiner must not bar the presence of a third party based on the third party's training or credentials. Advance notice to the examiner or to any other person, organization, or agency is not required for the presence of a third party under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) The third party must provide their name to the examiner. The examiner must document the presence and stated identity of any third party in the written report of the examination. new text end new text begin (c) A third party may make a written or audio recording of the consultation or examination if the recording does not obstruct the conduct of the examination. A third party must not make a video recording of the consultation or examination. new text end new text begin (d) An examiner must not consider the examinee's exercise of rights under this subdivision as failing to cooperate with the examination. If an examiner determines that the examination has been obstructed, the examiner must describe in detail the nature of the obstruction in the body of the written report. For purposes of this subdivision, "obstruct" means to hinder the examination to the degree that the examination cannot be completed, unless the obstruction is necessary for the safety or well-being of the patient. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Violation. new text end new text begin A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct under section 148.10, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [148.095] ADMINISTRATIVE HOLD DURING COMPLAINT RESOLUTION PROCESS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Administrative hold. new text end new text begin (a) If there is a pending complaint against a licensee and the licensee fails to pay required renewal fees, fails to renew the license, or fails to complete required continuing education hours within the time prescribed by law, the board must place the license on an administrative hold. new text end new text begin (b) A license on an administrative hold: new text end new text begin (1) is expired and does not authorize the licensee to engage in the practice of chiropractic; and new text end new text begin (2) remains under the board's full jurisdiction for all purposes under sections 148.10 and 214.103, including investigation, adjudication, and imposition of discipline. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition on status change while on administrative hold. new text end new text begin (a) If the board places a license on administrative hold, the board must not: new text end new text begin (1) accept an application to voluntarily retire the license under section 148.075; new text end new text begin (2) terminate the license for failing to renew or to complete continuing education requirements; or new text end new text begin (3) otherwise change the license status of the licensee in a manner that allows the licensee to delay, avoid, or terminate the complaint resolution process. new text end new text begin (b) The board must remove the administrative hold upon the resolution of all pending complaints against the licensee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Licensee obligations not suspended. new text end new text begin An administrative hold on a license does not relieve a licensee of the legal obligation to timely renew the license, pay renewal or other required fees, or complete continuing education hours according to law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.10, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Loss and restoration of good standing. new text end new text begin The pendency of a complaint does not cause a license to lose good standing unless: (1) the complaint results in disciplinary action under this section or an equivalent disciplinary law in another jurisdiction; or (2) a stipulation and order or an equivalent order in another jurisdiction provides for the loss of good standing. A license is restored to good standing upon the satisfactory completion, expiration, or other agreed-upon termination of all terms of a stipulation and order or an equivalent order in another jurisdiction. An agreement for corrective action as described under section 214.103, subdivision 6, does not cause a license to lose good standing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.102, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Insurers. deleted text begin Two times each yeardeleted text end new text begin (a) Every January 1 and July 1, new text end each insurer authorized to sell insurance described in section 60A.06, subdivision 1, clause (13), and providing professional liability insurance to chiropractors shall submit to the board a report concerning the chiropractors against whom malpractice settlements or awards have been made to the plaintiff. The report must contain at least the following information: (1) the total number of malpractice settlements or awards made to the plaintiff; (2) the date the malpractice settlements or awards to the plaintiff were made; (3) the allegations contained in the claim or complaint leading to the settlements or awards made to the plaintiff; (4) the dollar amount of each malpractice settlement or award; (5) the regular address of the practice of the doctor of chiropractic against whom an award was made or with whom a settlement was made; and (6) the name of the doctor of chiropractic against whom an award was made or with whom a settlement was made. new text begin (b) new text end The insurance company shall, in addition to the above information, report to the board any information it possesses which tends to substantiate a charge that a doctor of chiropractic may have engaged in conduct violating section 148.10 and this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.105, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally. Any person who practices, or attempts to practice, chiropractic or who uses any of the terms or letters "Doctors of Chiropractic," "Chiropractor," "DC," or any other title or letters under any circumstances as to lead the public to believe that the person who so uses the terms is engaged in the practice of chiropractic, without having complied with the provisions of sections 148.01 to 148.104, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor; and, upon conviction, fined not less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000 or be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than six months or punished by both fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. It is the duty of the county attorney of the county in which the person practices to prosecute. Nothing in sections 148.01 to deleted text begin 148.105deleted text end new text begin 148.108new text end shall be considered as interfering with any person: (1) licensed by a health-related licensing board, as defined in section 214.01, subdivision 2, including psychological practitioners with respect to the use of hypnosis; (2) registered or licensed by the commissioner of health under section 214.13; or (3) engaged in other methods of healing regulated by law in the state of Minnesota; provided that the person confines activities within the scope of the license or other regulation and does not practice or attempt to practice chiropractic. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 148.108, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Chiropractic license fees. Fees for chiropractic licensure are the following amounts but may be adjusted lower by board action: (1) initial application for licensure deleted text begin feedeleted text end , $300; (2) annual renewal of an active license deleted text begin feedeleted text end , $250; deleted text begin (3) annual renewal of an inactive license fee, 75 percent of the current active license renewal fee under clause (2); deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end late renewal penalty deleted text begin feedeleted text end , $150 per month late; deleted text begin anddeleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end application for reinstatement of a deleted text begin voluntarily retired or inactivedeleted text end new text begin terminatednew text end license deleted text begin feedeleted text end , deleted text begin $187.50.deleted text end new text begin $100; andnew text end new text begin (5) penalty for failure to complete CE requirements at the time of license renewal: new text end new text begin (i) at the first failure to complete CE requirements at the time of license renewal, the amount of the fee for annual renewal of an active license under clause (2); new text end new text begin (ii) at the second failure to complete CE requirements at the time of license renewal, two times the amount of the fee for annual renewal of an active license under clause (2); and new text end new text begin (iii) at the third failure to complete CE requirements at the time of license renewal and every subsequent failure, three times the amount of the fee for annual renewal of an active license under clause (2). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin TRANSITION OF INACTIVE LICENSES.new text end new text begin On July 1, 2026, the Board of Chiropractic Examiners must administratively change all chiropractic licenses put on inactive license status under Minnesota Rules, part 2500.2020, before that date to a voluntarily retired license under Minnesota Statutes, section 148.075. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin REGISTRATION REINSTATEMENT RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin (a) The board must adopt rules removing the inactive status for chiropractic acupuncture and animal chiropractic registration reinstatement and establishing new chiropractic acupuncture and animal chiropractic registration reinstatement rules. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, chapter 2500, the interim chiropractic acupuncture and animal chiropractic registration reinstatement procedures established in sections 16 and 17 control the chiropractic acupuncture and animal chiropractic registration reinstatement process until the rules required under paragraph (a) become effective. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin INTERIM CHIROPRACTIC ACUPUNCTURE REGISTRATION REINSTATEMENT PROCEDURES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin This section applies to a chiropractor whose Minnesota chiropractic acupuncture registration was canceled. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application requirements. new text end new text begin At the time of application for reinstatement of an acupuncture registration, the applicant must: new text end new text begin (1) hold an active Minnesota chiropractic license; new text end new text begin (2) submit an application for reinstatement; new text end new text begin (3) pay the current renewal fee; new text end new text begin (4) submit license verification from each jurisdiction where the applicant holds or has held a chiropractic license; and new text end new text begin (5) complete any additional applicable requirements as established in subdivisions 3, 4, and 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of canceled registration for registrant in good standing in another jurisdiction. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the chiropractic acupuncture registration of an applicant in good standing in another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of a chiropractic acupuncture credential in good standing from each jurisdiction where the applicant is authorized to perform chiropractic acupuncture; and new text end new text begin (3) provides verification of completing two continuing education units in acupuncture or acupuncture-related subjects in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of canceled registration after five years or less. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the chiropractic acupuncture registration of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 and who applies for reinstatement five years or less after the Minnesota registration cancellation if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of: new text end new text begin (i) completing two continuing education hours in acupuncture or acupuncture-related subjects for each year since the applicant last held an active chiropractic acupuncture registration in Minnesota or credential in another jurisdiction; or new text end new text begin (ii) passing the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners Acupuncture Examination or the National Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine (NCCAOM) Examination, or an alternate examination the board determines is equivalent, within 12 months after application. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of canceled registration license after more than five years. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the chiropractic acupuncture registration of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 and who applies for reinstatement more than five years after the Minnesota registration cancellation if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of passing either the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners Acupuncture Examination or the NCCAOM Examination, or an alternative examination the board determines is equivalent, within 12 months after application. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Continuing education in year of reinstatement. new text end new text begin A licensee must not use continuing education units obtained for the purpose of applying for reinstatement of a canceled registration under this section to meet the annual requirement for the year the license is reinstated. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Board authority. new text end new text begin Applications for reinstatement and registrations reinstated under this section are subject to the same board authority under Minnesota Statutes, sections 148.10 and 214.103, as other applications and registrations issued by the board to deny, refuse to issue, revoke, suspend, condition, or limit a license or to take disciplinary or corrective action against a registrant or applicant for conduct that violates applicable law or professional standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This section expires on the date the rules required under section 15, paragraph (a), become effective. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin INTERIM ANIMAL CHIROPRACTIC REGISTRATION REINSTATEMENT PROCEDURES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin This section applies to a chiropractor whose Minnesota animal chiropractic registration was canceled. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application requirements. new text end new text begin At the time of application for reinstatement of an animal chiropractic registration, the applicant must: new text end new text begin (1) hold an active Minnesota chiropractic license; new text end new text begin (2) submit an application for reinstatement; new text end new text begin (3) pay the current renewal fee; new text end new text begin (4) submit license verification from each jurisdiction where the applicant holds or has held a chiropractic license; and new text end new text begin (5) complete any additional applicable requirements as established in subdivisions 3 and 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of canceled registration for registrant in good standing in another jurisdiction. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the animal chiropractic registration of an applicant who holds an animal chiropractic credential that is equivalent to a Minnesota registration and in good standing in another jurisdiction if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of an animal acupuncture credential in good standing from each jurisdiction where the applicant is authorized to perform animal acupuncture; and new text end new text begin (3) provides verification of completing six continuing education units in animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment in the year immediately preceding the application for reinstatement. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reinstatement of canceled registration for registrant with no animal chiropractic credential in good standing in another jurisdiction. new text end new text begin The board must reinstate the registration of an applicant who does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) completes all requirements in subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) provides verification of completing six continuing education units related to animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment for each year the applicant cannot verify an active animal chiropractic credential that is equivalent to a Minnesota registration and in good standing. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Continuing education in year of reinstatement. new text end new text begin A licensee must not use continuing education hours obtained for the purposes of applying for reinstatement of a canceled registration under this section to meet the annual hour requirement for the year the license is reinstated. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Board authority. new text end new text begin Applications for reinstatement and registrations reinstated under this section are subject to the same board authority under Minnesota Statutes, sections 148.10 and 214.103, as other applications and registrations issued by the board to deny, refuse to issue, revoke, suspend, condition, or limit a license or to take disciplinary or corrective action against a registrant or applicant for conduct that violates applicable law or professional standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This section expires on the date the rules required under section 15, paragraph (a), become effective. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 18. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber each provision of Minnesota Statutes listed in column A to the number listed in column B. The revisor shall also make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering: new text end new text begin Column A new text end new text begin Column B new text end new text begin 148.01, subdivision 1a new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 1 new text end new text begin 148.01, subdivision 1b new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 2 new text end new text begin 148.01, subdivision 1c new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 3 new text end new text begin 148.01, subdivision 1d new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 4 new text end new text begin 148.032, paragraphs (a) and (b) new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 5, paragraphs (a) and (b) new text end new text begin 148.032, paragraphs (c) and (d) new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 6, paragraphs (a) and (b) new text end new text begin 148.032, paragraphs (e) new text end new text begin 148.032, subdivision 7 new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 19. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, parts 2500.0100, subparts 5b, 6, and 12; 2500.1900; 2500.2020; 2500.2040; 2500.2100; and 2500.2110, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 26-07854 2500.0100 DEFINITIONS. § Subp. 5b. Good standing. "Good standing" means any license which is not the subject of current disciplinary action as identified in Minnesota Statutes, section 148.10, subdivisions 1, 3, and 4. The pendency of a complaint shall not cause a license to lose good standing unless and until the complaint results in disciplinary action under Minnesota Statutes, section 148.10 or pursuant to a stipulation and order. A license shall be restored to good standing upon the satisfactory completion, expiration, or other agreed upon termination of all terms of a stipulation and order. An agreement for corrective action as described under Minnesota Statutes, section 214.103, subdivision 6, shall not cause a license to lose good standing. § Subp. 6. Inactive license. "Inactive license" means a restricted license that allows the licensee to maintain a license but does not allow the licensee to actively practice in Minnesota. § Subp. 12. Voluntarily retired license. "Voluntarily retired license" means a license which has been voluntarily surrendered by a chiropractor. It relinquishes all rights to practice chiropractic in Minnesota. 2500.1900 LICENSE REINSTATEMENT. A license terminated by reason of the licensee's failure to comply with the continuing education requirements of parts 2500.1200 to 2500.2000, or failure to submit a completed application for license renewal as prescribed by the board, may be reinstated or restored to full status by following one of the applicable procedures in items A to E. § A. An applicant whose license has been terminated for a period of less than five years, and who can verify continual practice elsewhere during that time, shall be reinstated by completing all interim continuing education and paying all interim licensure fees that would have been required for continual licensure, paying any accrued penalty fees established in part 2500.1100, subpart 3, and repairing any other deficiencies that led to the termination. § B. An applicant whose license has been terminated for a period of greater than five years and who can verify continual practice elsewhere during that time must, in addition to following the procedures in item A, complete the board's jurisprudence examination. § C. An applicant whose license has been terminated for a period of less than five years, and who cannot verify continual practice during that time, shall be reinstated by completing all interim continuing education that would have been required for continual licensure, completing an additional ten units of approved continuing education for each intervening renewal year, paying all accrued penalty fees and interim licensure fees required for continual licensure, and repairing any other deficiencies that led to the termination. § D. An applicant whose license has been terminated for a period of greater than five years, and who cannot verify continual practice during that time, shall be reinstated by paying all accrued penalty fees and interim licensure fees that would have been required for continual licensure, repairing any other deficiencies that led to the termination, taking the board's jurisprudence examination, and completing the Special Purposes Examination in Chiropractic administered by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or other examination approved by the board. § E. At the election of the applicant, the board shall waive any of the continuing education requirements in items A to C upon successful completion of the Special Purposes Examination in Chiropractic administered by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or any other examination approved by the board, within 12 months preceding the application. Any continuing education units acquired in another jurisdiction for the purposes of license renewal may be applied to item A, B, or C. None of the continuing education units obtained for the purpose of reinstating a terminated license apply to the current annual requirement. Applicants must complete a board-approved application for reinstatement. 2500.2020 INACTIVE LICENSE. A Minnesota licensed chiropractor may apply to the board for an inactive license according to items A to C. An inactive license is intended for those chiropractors who will be in active practice elsewhere. § A. Applicants must complete a board-approved application which must include a signed affidavit stating that the applicant will no longer be actively practicing chiropractic in the state of Minnesota. § B. Upon approval of an application, the board will modify the annual license certificate to indicate inactive licensure. § C. The board may refuse to approve an application if: § (1) a pending or final disciplinary action exists against an applicant's Minnesota license; § (2) a pending or final disciplinary action exists against an applicant's license in another state where the applicant has been licensed to practice chiropractic; or § (3) the applicant's Minnesota license is not current in fees and penalties paid, or in continuing education units obtained for annual license renewal. 2500.2040 REINSTATEMENT OF INACTIVE LICENSE. An inactive license may be reinstated to an active license according to items A to E: § A. completion of a board-approved application of reinstatement; § B. payment of a reinstatement fee in the amount of $100; § C. submission of a certification of good standing from each state the doctor was granted a license; § D. submission of a notarized statement from the doctor stating: § (1) that the doctor has remained in active practice in another state or country during the period of inactive license status in Minnesota; § (2) that the doctor has met the continuing education requirements as approved by Minnesota or the states or countries in which the doctor practiced chiropractic, or has taken at least 12 units of continuing education each year of inactive license status, whichever is greater; and § (3) the specific addresses of where the doctor has been in active practice; and § E. completion of 20 units of continuing education as approved by the board the year prior to application for reinstatement. If any of the requirements of items A to E are not met by the doctor, the board will deny approval of the application for reinstatement. 2500.2100 VOLUNTARILY RETIRED LICENSE. Upon request of a Minnesota licensed chiropractor, the board may place a license in voluntary retirement unless: § A. a pending or final disciplinary action exists against an applicant's Minnesota license; § B. a pending or final disciplinary action exists against an applicant's license in another state where the applicant has been licensed to practice chiropractic; or § C. the applicant's Minnesota license is not current in fees and penalties paid or in continuing education units obtained for annual license renewal. 2500.2110 REINSTATEMENT OF VOLUNTARILY RETIRED LICENSE. § A. An applicant who has voluntarily retired a license may be reinstated or restored to full status by: § (1) completing a board-approved application of reinstatement; § (2) paying a reinstatement fee in the amount of $100; § (3) submitting a certification of good standing from each state the doctor was granted a license; and § (4) following one of the applicable procedures in items B to F. § B. An applicant who has been voluntarily retired for a period of less than five years, and who can verify continual practice elsewhere during that time, shall be reinstated by completing all interim continuing education and paying all accrued penalty fees and interim licensure fees which would have been required for continual licensure, and repairing any deficiencies that occurred prior to retirement. § C. An applicant who has been voluntarily retired for a period of greater than five years who can verify continual practice elsewhere during that time must, in addition to following the procedures in items A and B, complete the board's jurisprudence examination. § D. An applicant who has been voluntarily retired for a period of less than five years, and who cannot verify continual practice during that time, shall be reinstated by completing all interim continuing education that would have been required for continual licensure, completing an additional ten units of approved continuing education for each intervening renewal year, paying all accrued penalty fees and interim licensure fees that would have been required for continual licensure, and repairing any deficiencies that occurred prior to retirement. § E. An applicant who has been voluntarily retired for a period of greater than five years, and who cannot verify continual practice during that time, shall be reinstated by paying all accrued penalty fees and interim licensure fees that would have been required for continual licensure, repairing any other deficiencies that may have occurred prior to retirement, taking the board's jurisprudence examination, and completing the Special Purposes Examination in Chiropractic administered by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or any other examination the board may deem appropriate. § F. At the election of the applicant, the board shall waive any of the continuing education requirements in items B to D, upon successful completion of the Special Purposes Examination in Chiropractic administered by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or other examination the board may deem appropriate, within the 12 months preceding the application. Any continuing education units acquired in another jurisdiction, for the purposes of license renewal, may be applied to items B, C, and D. None of the continuing education units obtained for the purpose of reinstating a voluntarily retired license apply to the current annual requirement. Applicants must complete a board-approved application of reinstatement.